Utah statutes.
78B-6-1236.   Conveyance to be recorded -- Operates as a bar.
(1)  The conveyances shall be recorded in the county where the property is
located.
(2)  The recording shall be a bar against:
(a)  all persons interested in the property in any way, who have been named as
parties in the action;
(b)  all parties or persons who were unknown, if the summons was served by
publication, and all persons claiming under them; and
(c)  all persons having unrecorded deeds or liens at the commencement of the
action.
